Utah statutes.
16-6a-403.   Corporate name -- Limited rights.
The authorization granted by the division to file articles of incorporation
under a corporate name or to reserve a name does not:
(1)  abrogate or limit the law governing unfair competition or unfair trade
practices;
(2)  derogate from the common law the principles of equity or the statutes of
this state or of the United States with respect to the right to acquire and
protect names and trademarks; or
(3)  create an exclusive right in geographic or generic terms contained within
a name.
